Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 5 Divorce and Separation
15-5-24.
Support — Wage assignment procedures.

With respect to a support order issued, enforced, or modified on or after January 1, 1994, the income of an obligor shall be subject to immediate income withholding under chapter 16 of this title on the effective date of the order, regardless of whether support payments by the obligor are in arrears; provided, that the income of the obligor shall not be subject to immediate income withholding: (1) if a judge or magistrate of the family court finds that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding, or (2) if the obligor and obligee (and the department in the case of an obligee subject to an assignment of support rights under §

40-6-9

) enter into a written agreement or the family court enters an order which provides for an alternative agreement for the timely payment of support due under the support order. In no event shall the court order wage withholding payable to the obligee directly from any wage withholding agent.

The obligor shall be given the notice by way of the pleadings or otherwise, that his or her income is subject to immediate income withholding as provided in subsection (a) of this section, that the maximum amount of income to be withheld may not exceed the limit permitted under § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (15 U.S.C. 1673(b)), and that he or she may contest immediate income withholding, and assert any defenses, exceptions or exemptions to which he or she may be entitled, at a hearing before a judge or magistrate of the family court.

An immediate income withholding order issued under this section shall be filed by the obligee or the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement with the clerk of the family court and shall be subject to the provisions of §§

15-16-9

—

15-16-12

.

A wage withholding made under this section shall be binding upon a wage withholding agent one week after service upon the wage withholding agent of the wage withholding by personal service or by registered or certified mail, until further order of the court. For purposes of this chapter, the term “employer” includes the state and federal governments and the political subdivisions of the state. The wage withholding agent shall remit to the clerk of the family court, or other designated remittee, within seven (7) days of the date of withholding, the amount withheld pursuant to the wage withholding and the wage withholding agent shall specify the date and amount of each withholding included in the remittance, the social security number of the obligor, the child support account number, the employee’s name and any other information as required if electronic transfer is utilized. The wage withholding agent may combine withheld amounts from two (2) or more obligors into a single payment, provided that the withholding agent separately identifies the individual obligors and the amount attributable to each obligor.

The wage withholding agent may not use the wage withholding as a basis for the discharge of an employee or for any disciplinary action against the employee.

The wage withholding agent must notify the clerk of the family court, in writing, of the termination of the obligor employee’s employment within ten (10) days of termination. Notice must include the name and address of the obligor employee’s new employer if known.

A wage withholding under this section shall have priority over any attachment, execution, garnishment, or wage assignment unless otherwise ordered by the court. A wage withholding under this section shall not be subject to any specific or general statutory exemption or limitation prohibiting levy, execution, assignment, or attachment process or limiting the amount subject to assignment levied against the income of the obligor employee except as provided by federal law.

The family court is authorized and directed to promulgate rules, regulations, and forms reasonably calculated to apprise the obligor of exemptions available to him or her under the law with respect to a family court wage withholding and the procedure for asserting these exemptions.

A wage withholding agent may deduct two dollars ($2.00) from the obligor’s remaining income for each payment made pursuant to a wage withholding under this section to cover the wage withholding agent’s expenses involved in the wage withholdings.

The obligor shall pay all costs involved in the wage withholdings.

The justices or magistrate(s) of the family court shall enter, when appropriate, an order for payment of reasonable counsel fees for the prosecution of the wage withholdings.

Any judgment or order of support issuing from a court of competent jurisdiction of any state shall have the same force and effect as if the judgment or order issued from the Rhode Island family court.

For purposes of this section and §§

15-5-25

and

15-5-26

, the following definitions apply:

“Income” includes amounts paid or payable to an obligor as:

Compensation paid or payable for personal services whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, whether taxable or not taxable, and specifically including periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs or insurance policies of any type; and

Benefit payments or other similar compensation paid or payable to the obligor by or through a department, agency, or political subdivision of the state or federal government, or by an insurance company, including unemployment compensation benefits, workers’ compensation benefits, and temporary disability benefits, except where garnishment or attachment of such benefit payments is prohibited by federal law.

“Wage withholding agent” means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, trust, federal or state agency, department, or political subdivision, paying or obligated to pay income, as defined in this subsection, to an obligor of court ordered child support.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 478, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 1.

15-5-24.1.
Visitation rights of grandparents.

The court may, upon miscellaneous petition of a grandparent whose child is deceased, grant reasonable visitation rights of the grandchild or grandchildren to the grandparent, whether or not any divorce or custody proceedings were ever commenced, and may issue all necessary orders to enforce visitation rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 104, § 1.

15-5-24.2.
Visitation rights of grandparents whose child is denied or has failed to exercise rights.

In any divorce proceeding the family court may, upon petition of a grandparent whose grandchild is a child of the marriage, grant reasonable visitation rights of the grandchild to the grandparent. The court may issue all necessary orders to enforce visitation rights. Once a grandparent has been granted reasonable visitation rights, notice of any petition and/or order providing for a change in custody or visitation shall be provided to the grandparent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 23.

15-5-24.3.
Visitation rights — Grandparents and siblings.

The family court, upon miscellaneous petition of a grandparent for visitation rights with the petitioner’s grandchild, and upon notice to both parents of the child, and after a hearing on the petition, may grant reasonable rights of visitation of the grandchild to the petitioner.

The court, in order to grant the petitioner reasonable rights of visitation, must find and set forth in writing the following findings of fact:

That it is in the best interest of the grandchild as determined on a case-by-case basis that the petitioner is granted visitation rights with the grandchild.In considering whether it is in the child’s best interests, the court shall consider all the relevant factors including, but not limited to:

The nature of the relationship between the child and the grandparent seeking visitation;

The amount of time the grandparent and child spent together;

The potential detriments and benefits to the child from granting visitation;

The potential effect of granting visitation on the parent-child relationship;

The preferences of the grandchild who is of sufficient intelligence, understanding, and experience to express a preference; and

The reasons that the parent(s) believe that it is not in their child’s best interests to have visitation with the grandparent(s);

That the petitioner is a fit and proper person to have visitation rights with the grandchild;

That the petitioner has repeatedly attempted to visit his or her grandchild during the thirty (30) days immediately preceding the date the petition was filed and was not allowed to visit the grandchild during the thirty-day (30) period as a direct result of the actions of either, or both, parents of the grandchild;

That there is no other way the petitioner is able to visit his or her grandchild without court intervention; and

That the petitioner, by clear and convincing evidence, has successfully rebutted the presumption that the parent’s decision to refuse the grandparent visitation with the grandchild was reasonable.

The court may assess the reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the parent(s) to the grandparent(s) if the petition for visitation is denied.

The family court, upon miscellaneous petition of, or on behalf of, a sibling(s) for visitation rights with a minor brother(s), and/or step-brother(s), and/or sister(s), and/or step-sister(s) of the sibling(s) and upon notice to both parents of the minor, and after a hearing on the petition, may grant reasonable rights of visitation of the minor to a sibling(s).

The court, in order to grant a sibling reasonable rights of visitation, must find and set forth in writing the following findings of fact:

That it is in the best interest of the minor that a sibling(s) be granted visitation rights with the minor;

That the sibling(s) is a fit and proper person to have visitation rights with the minor;

That the sibling(s) was not allowed to visit the minor during the thirty-day (30) period immediately preceding the date the petition was filed as a direct result of the actions of either, or both, parents or guardians of the minor;

That there is no other way the sibling(s) is able to visit the minor without court intervention; and

That the sibling(s), by clear and convincing evidence, has successfully rebutted the presumption that the parental decision to refuse the visitation with the minor was reasonable.

The court may issue all necessary orders relative to the visitation rights it has granted. Once a petition has been granted, notice of any petition seeking a change in custody or visitation shall be served on the petitioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 334, § 1.

15-5-24.4.
Sibling visitation rights.

The family court, upon miscellaneous petition of a brother, sister, half-brother or half-sister, stepbrother, stepsister, or on behalf of any of those persons by his or her legal guardian, for visitation rights for the petitioner’s sibling, half-sibling or stepsibling and upon notice to both parents of the child and notice to the child, and after a hearing on the petition, may grant reasonable rights of visitation of the sibling to the petitioner. The court, in order to grant reasonable rights of visitation, must find and set forth in writing the following findings of fact:

That it is in the best interests of the child that the petitioner is granted visitation rights with the child;

That the petitioner is a fit and proper person to have visitation rights with the child;

That the petitioner has repeatedly attempted to visit his or her sibling, half-sibling or stepsibling during the thirty (30) days immediately preceding the date the petition was filed and was not allowed to visit the child during the thirty (30) day period as a direct result of the actions of either, or both, parents of the child;

There is no other way that the petitioner is able to visit his or her sibling, half-sibling or stepsibling without court intervention; and

That the petitioner, by clear and convincing evidence, has successfully rebutted the presumption that the parent’s decision to refuse the petitioner’s visitation with the child was reasonable.

The court may issue all necessary orders relative to the visitation rights granted to the petitioner. Once the petitioner has been granted reasonable visitation rights, notice of any petition seeking a change in custody or visitation shall be served on the petitioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 200, § 1.

15-5-24.5.
Court ordered visitation rights to certain persons convicted of first degree murder — Prohibited.

No court shall make an order providing visitation rights to a parent who has been convicted of murder in the first degree of the other parent of the child who is the subject of the order, unless that court first conducts a hearing in order to determine whether the child is of an appropriate age, maturity, intelligence and voluntarily consents to the visitation. No person shall cause, facilitate, or assist a child to visit a parent who has been convicted of murder in the first degree of the other parent of the child without the consent of the child’s custodian or legal guardian except as authorized by a court order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 471, § 1.

15-5-25.
Application for wage withholding — Obligor in arrears.

In cases where a wage withholding has not been secured pursuant to §

15-5-24

, upon application of the child or of any person having a direct interest in the welfare of the child, or any person to whom support is owed pursuant to court order, the court, pursuant to this section and upon a showing that a support payment has not been made in full within fourteen (14) days of its due date, may order a wage withholding agent of the obligor:

To withhold from the obligor’s income presently due, and from future income as it becomes due, amounts which shall satisfy the obligor’s previous arrearage in support payments, the obligor’s obligation to pay support as it accrues in the future, and any attorney’s fees that may be awarded in a proceeding under this section;

To deduct from the balance of the obligor’s income a fee of two dollars ($2.00) to cover the employer’s expenses involved in withholding and transmitting the support payment;

To remit the amount withheld under subsection (a) of this section to the clerk of the family court or other designated remittee entering the order, within seven (7) days of the date of withholding, and to specify the date and amount of each withholding included in the remittance, the social security number of the obligor, the child support account number, the employee’s name, and any other information as required if electronic transfer is utilized. The wage withholding agent may combine withheld amounts from two (2) or more obligors into a single payment, provided that the wage withholding agent separately identifies the individual obligors and the amount attributable to each obligor;

To refrain from dismissing, disciplining, or in any way penalizing the obligor employee on account of the proceeding to collect support, on account of any order or orders entered by the court in the proceeding, and on account of wage withholding agent compliance with the order or orders; and

To notify, in writing, the clerk of the family court entering the order of the termination of the obligor’s employment and the name and address, if known, of the obligor’s new employer within ten (10) days after termination of employment.

The application may be filed as part of any proceeding brought for failure to make support payments or may be made independently of any other support enforcement action.

Upon the filing of an application for wage withholding the court shall set a time for a hearing. The hearing shall be held within three (3) weeks of the date the application is filed with the court. No wage withholding shall become effective unless the obligor has been given notice, by way of the pleadings or otherwise, of the exemptions to which he or she may be entitled under the law and of the procedure for asserting these exemptions.

The applicant shall then cause to be served on the wage withholding agent a copy of the application, a notice of hearing, and interrogatories to be completed and returned by the wage withholding agent to the court no later than three (3) days prior to the hearing. The interrogatories when completed shall show whether the obligor receives income from or is an employee of the employer, whether the obligor performs work and provides services or makes sales in this state, the present length of employment of the obligor with the wage withholding agent, the present pay period for the obligor, the average earnings of the obligor per pay period, and the name and address of the person, office, or division of the wage withholding agent responsible for the preparation of the obligor’s income payments.

The applicant shall also cause to be served on the obligor a copy of the application and a notice of hearing.

Service under this section shall be personally or by mailing by registered or certified mail the documents required to be served.

Any order for wage withholding under this section shall have priority over any attachment, execution, garnishment, or wage assignment unless otherwise ordered by the court. This order shall not be subject to any specific or general statutory exemption or limitation prohibiting levy, execution, assignment, or attachment process or limiting the amount of executions issued against the income of the obligor except as provided by federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 478, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1.

15-5-26.
Duties and liabilities of employer under income assignment order or order for wage withholding.

Any wage withholding agent failing to comply with any requirements in §§

15-5-24

and

15-5-25

may be punished by the court for civil contempt. The court shall first afford the wage withholding agent a reasonable opportunity to purge itself of contempt.

Any wage withholding agent who fails or refuses to deliver income pursuant to an order under §§

15-5-24

and

15-5-25

, when the garnishing agent has had in its possession the income, shall be personally liable for the amount of the income which the wage withholding agent failed or refused to deliver, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Any wage withholding agent who dismisses, demotes, disciplines, or in any way penalizes an obligor on account of any proceeding to collect support, on account of any order or orders entered by the court in the proceeding, or on account of the wage withholding agent’s compliance with the order or orders, shall be liable to the obligor for all damages, together with costs, interest thereon, and reasonable attorney’s fees resulting from the action, and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100). The wage withholding agent shall be required to make full restitution to the aggrieved obligor including reinstatements and back pay.

A wage withholding agent may be enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from continuing any action in violation of §§

15-5-24

and

15-5-25

.

Any proceeding against a wage withholding agent under this section must be commenced within ninety (90) days after a wage withholding agent’s act or failure to act upon which the proceeding is based.

Compliance by a wage withholding agent with an order issued under §§

15-5-24

and

15-5-25

operates as a discharge of the wage withholding agent’s liability to the obligor as to that portion of the obligor’s income so affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1.

15-5-27.
Order for wage withholding — Duration.

An order for wage withholding under §§

15-5-24

and

15-5-25

shall remain in effect until modified or terminated by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1.

15-5-28.
Judgment or order as lien on property — Duration — Effect.

A certified copy of any judgment or order which contains a provision adjudging a party to the action in contempt for failure to pay any support payment, or which states an arrearage due on any support payment or payments, may be recorded with the recorder of deeds in any city or town where real estate owned by the obligor may be found, and shall become a lien upon all real property of the obligor owned by the obligor in the city or town at the time of the recording. The division of taxation, child support enforcement shall not be required to pay a recording fee. The lien shall remain in full force and effect unless the lien is discharged by the obligee or his or her attorney or subsequent family court judgment or order as provided in this section.

The certificate of the obligee, or his or her attorney duly signed and notarized, or a certified copy of a judgment or order of the family court which contains a provision that all arrearages have been paid in full, shall, when recorded, be a discharge in full of the land.

If any amount of child support provided in a judgment or order has been directed to be paid to the clerk of the court or to any other office designated by the court pursuant to any other provision of law, and the directive is set forth in the copy of the docketed judgment or order, or in the docket or certified copy of an amended or supplemental order, the certificate shall not affect the lien unless also approved in writing by the clerk or other designated officer.

A lien under this section shall not be dischargeable in bankruptcy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 354, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 1.

15-5-29.
Mediation proceedings involving custody and/or visitation.

Where, in any petition for divorce, divorce from bed and board, or relief without the commencement of divorce proceedings, the family court may, as to issues of custody and visitation, direct the parties to participate in mediation in an effort to resolve their differences, the court may order the participation in mediation in a program established by the court.

At its discretion, the court may:

Order mediation under this section prior to trial and postpone trial of the case pending the outcome of the mediation, in which case the issues of custody and visitation shall be tried only upon failure to resolve the issues of custody by mediation;

Order mediation under this section prior to trial and proceed to try the case as to issues other than custody and visitation while the parties are at the same time engaged in the mediation, in which the issue of custody shall be tried separately upon failure to resolve the issues; and

Complete the trial of the case on all issues and order mediation under this section upon the conclusion of the trial, postponing entry of the decree pending outcome of the mediation, in which case the court may enter a temporary decree as to issues other than custody any visitation upon completion of the trial or may postpone entry of any decree until the expiration of the mediation period of agreement of the parties.

Communications made by or to a mediator or between parties in the presence of the mediator as a part of mediation ordered under this section are privileged and are not admissible as evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 422, § 1.